Hawaii statutes.
§226-18 Objectives and policies for
facility systems--energy. (a) Planning for the State's facility systems
with regard to energy shall be directed toward the achievement of the following
objectives, giving due consideration to all:

(1) Dependable, efficient, and economical statewide
energy systems capable of supporting the needs of the people;

(2) Increased energy security and self-sufficiency
through the reduction and ultimate elimination of Hawaii's dependence on
imported fuels for electrical generation and ground transportation;

(3) Greater diversification of energy generation in
the face of threats to Hawaii's energy supplies and systems;

(4) Reduction, avoidance, or sequestration of
greenhouse gas emissions from energy supply and use; and

(5) Utility models that make the social and financial
interests of Hawaii's utility customers a priority.

(b) To achieve the energy objectives, it shall
be the policy of this State to ensure the short- and long-term provision of
adequate, reasonably priced, and dependable energy services to accommodate
demand.

(c) To further achieve the energy objectives,
it shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Support research and development as well as
promote the use of renewable energy sources;

(2) Ensure that the combination of energy supplies
and energy-saving systems is sufficient to support the demands of growth;

(3) Base decisions of least-cost supply-side and
demand-side energy resource options on a comparison of their total costs and
benefits when a least-cost is determined by a reasonably comprehensive,
quantitative, and qualitative accounting of their long-term, direct and
indirect economic, environmental, social, cultural, and public health costs and
benefits;

(4) Promote all cost-effective conservation of power
and fuel supplies through measures, including:

(A) Development of cost-effective demand-side
management programs;

(B) Education;

(C) Adoption of energy-efficient practices
and technologies; and

(D) Increasing energy efficiency and decreasing
energy use in public infrastructure;

(5) Ensure, to the extent that new supply-side
resources are needed, that the development or expansion of energy systems uses
the least-cost energy supply option and maximizes efficient technologies;

(6) Support research, development, demonstration, and
use of energy efficiency, load management, and other demand-side management
programs, practices, and technologies;

(7) Promote alternate fuels and transportation energy
efficiency;

(8) Support actions that reduce, avoid, or sequester
greenhouse gases in utility, transportation, and industrial sector
applications;

(9) Support actions that reduce, avoid, or sequester
Hawaii's greenhouse gas emissions through agriculture and forestry initiatives;

(10) Provide priority handling and processing for all
state and county permits required for renewable energy projects;

(11) Ensure that liquefied natural gas is used only as
a cost-effective transitional, limited-term replacement of petroleum for
electricity generation and does not impede the development and use of other
cost-effective renewable energy sources; and

(12) Promote the development of indigenous geothermal
energy resources that are located on public trust land as an affordable and
reliable source of firm power for Hawaii. [L 1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L 1986,
c 276, §17; am L 1990, c 319, §2; am L 1994, c 96, §4; am L 2000, c 176, §1; am
L 2007, c 205, §6; am L 2009, c 155, §17 and c 156, §3; am L 2012, c 193, §1;
am L 2015, c 38, §2]

Note

L 2012, c 193, §2
provides:

"SECTION 2. There shall be consultation and public
input from the Native Hawaiian community and the general public when developing
projects with public land trust lands."

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next